Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 4. Proof of Financial Responsibility

Cross references. —

As to required deposits of insurance by motor carriers, see §

31-18-209

.

§ 31-9-401.
Suspension and revocation of license and registrations until proof maintained; when proof required.

Whenever the division, under any law of this state, mandatorily suspends or revokes the license of any person, the division shall also suspend the registration for all motor vehicles registered in the name of the person, except that the registration shall not be suspended, unless otherwise required by law, if the person has given or gives and maintains proof of financial responsibility with respect to all motor vehicles registered by the person.

The license and registration shall not be renewed nor shall any license be issued to the person, nor shall any motor vehicle be registered in the name of the person until permitted under the motor vehicle laws of this state and until he shall give and maintain proof of financial responsibility.

If a person is not licensed, but by final order or judgment is convicted of or forfeits any bail or collateral deposited to secure an appearance for trial for any offense requiring the suspension or revocation of license, or for operating a motor vehicle upon the highways without being licensed to do so, or for operating an unregistered motor vehicle upon the highways, no license shall be issued to the person and no motor vehicle shall continue to be registered or be registered in the name of the person until he shall give and maintain proof of financial responsibility.

Whenever the division suspends or revokes a nonresident’s operating privileges, the privileges shall remain so suspended or revoked unless the person has given or gives and maintains proof of financial responsibility.

Proof of financial responsibility required to be given and maintained under this act shall be maintained for three (3) years from the date it is required except as provided in W.S.

31-9-413

.

Subsections (a) through (e) of this section do not apply to the suspension of a license or nonresident operating privilege under W.S. 31-7-128(f), (g) or (n).

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 17; C.S. 1945, § 60-1517; Laws 1955, ch. 23, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, § 31-302; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 173, § 1; 1991, ch. 233, § 1; 2007, ch. 68, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, updated the internal references in (f).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (e), see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

Division's employees immune from liability. —

Section

1-39-108

(liability of public utilities) does not, within its language, include the authorities that license public employees or the entities that provide gas, electric, transportation and other listed services. Thus, the enforcement of this state's financial responsibility laws by employees of the division is not included in the waiver of immunity articulated by §

1-39-108

.Gibson v. State, 811 P.2d 726,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 1991).

Only persons with suspended or revoked licenses affected bysection. —

This section does not apply to or affect the registration of motor vehicles of any person other than a person whose driver's license is suspended or revoked. Wyoming Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. May, 434 P.2d 507,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1967).

Proof of financial responsibility under this article is required only in cases where

the superintendent (now division) has received a record of conviction or the forfeiture of bail of a person and has suspended or revoked that person's driver's license, or where the owner of the vehicle is involved in an accident, or where a person involved in an accident is using a motor vehicle of another person with permission of the owner. Wyoming Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. May, 434 P.2d 507,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1967).

Quoted

in

Michelsen v. Gilbert, 449 P.2d 795,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1969).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Combining or “stacking” of “no fault” or personal injury protection (PIP) coverages in automobile liability policy or policies, 29 ALR4th 12.

Combining or “stacking” medical payment provisions of automobile liability policy or policies issued by one or more insurers to one insured, 29 ALR4th 49.

§ 31-9-402.
Types of proof.

Proof of financial responsibility shall be furnished for each motor vehicle registered by any person required to give proof and may be given by filing:

A certificate of insurance as provided in W.S.

31-9-403

or

31-9-404

;

A bond as provided in W.S.

31-9-408

; or

A certificate of deposit of money or securities as provided in W.S.

31-9-409

.

Proof of financial responsibility may be furnished as allowed by W.S.

31-9-110

.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 18; C.S. 1945, § 60-1518; W.S. 1957, § 31-303; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2013 ch. 102, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (b).

Stated

in

Wyoming Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. May, 434 P.2d 507,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1967).

§ 31-9-403.
Certificate of insurance carrier.

Proof of financial responsibility may be furnished by filing with the division the written certificate of any insurance carrier authorized to do business in this state certifying that there is in effect a motor vehicle liability policy for the benefit of the person required to furnish proof of financial responsibility. The certificate shall give the effective date of the motor vehicle liability policy which shall be the same as the effective date of the certificate, and shall designate by explicit description or by appropriate reference all motor vehicles covered thereby unless the policy is issued to a person who is not the owner of a motor vehicle.

No motor vehicle shall be or continue to be registered in the name of any person required to file proof of financial responsibility unless the motor vehicle is designated in the certificate.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 19; C.S. 1945, § 60-1519; W.S. 1957, § 31-304; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Filing of insurance company certificate permissive and optional.—

Under the provisions of this section, the filing of the insurance company certificate is permissive and optional, and seemingly is to be made by the owner and not by the insurance company. Wyoming Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. May, 434 P.2d 507,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1967).

No requirement that certificate contain insurer's opinion asto application of policy. —

There is no requirement in the financial responsibility laws that the certificate of proof of financial responsibility contain any opinion or conclusion of the insurance company or its authorized agent to the effect that the policy applies to either the named owner or operator of the described vehicle. Wyoming Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. May, 434 P.2d 507,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1967).

Quoted

in

Michelsen v. Gilbert, 449 P.2d 795,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1969); Allstate Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Ins. Dep't, 672 P.2d 810,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 31-9-404.
Nonresidents.

The nonresident owner of a motor vehicle not registered in this state may give proof of financial responsibility by filing with the division a written certificate of an insurance carrier authorized to transact business in the state in which the motor vehicle described in the certificate is registered, or if the nonresident does not own a motor vehicle, then in the state in which the insured resides, if the certificate otherwise conforms to the provisions of this act. The division shall accept the certificate upon condition that the insurance carrier complies with the following provisions with respect to the policies certified:

The insurance carrier shall execute a power of attorney authorizing the division to accept service on its behalf of notice or process in any action arising out of a motor vehicle accident in this state;

The insurance carrier shall agree in writing that the policies shall be deemed to conform with the laws of this state relating to the terms of motor vehicle liability policies issued herein.

If any insurance carrier not authorized to transact business in this state, which has qualified to furnish proof of financial responsibility, defaults in any undertaking or agreement, the division shall not accept as proof any certificate of the carrier so long as the default continues.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 20; C.S. 1945, § 60-1520; W.S. 1957, § 31-305; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a), see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

§ 31-9-405.
“Liability policy” defined; required coverage; additional clauses.

As used in this act “liability policy” means an owner’s or an operator’s policy of liability insurance, certified as provided in W.S.

31-9-403

or

31-9-404

as proof of financial responsibility, and issued, except as otherwise provided in W.S.

31-9-404

, by an insurance carrier authorized to transact business in this state, to or for the benefit of the person named as insured.

An owner’s policy of liability insurance shall:

Designate by explicit description or by appropriate reference all motor vehicles with respect to which coverage is to be granted; and

Insure the person named and, except for persons specifically excluded pursuant to W.S.

26-35-105

, any other person, as insured, using any covered motor vehicle with the express or implied permission of the named insured against loss from the liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of the motor vehicle within the United States of America or the Dominion of Canada, subject to limits exclusive of interest and costs with respect to each motor vehicle, as follows: twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of one (1) person in any one (1) accident and, subject to the limit for one (1) person, fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one (1) accident and twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one (1) accident.

An operator’s policy of liability insurance shall insure the person named as insured against loss from the liability imposed upon him by law for damages arising out of the use by him of any motor vehicle not owned by him, within the same territorial limits and subject to the same limits of liability as provided by subsection (b) of this section.

The motor vehicle liability policy shall state the name and address of the named insured, the coverage afforded by the policy, the premium charged therefor, the policy period and the limits of liability, and shall contain an agreement or be endorsed that insurance is provided in accordance with the coverage defined in this act as respects bodily injury and death or property damage, or both, and is subject to all the provisions of this act.

The motor vehicle liability policy shall not insure any liability under any worker’s compensation law nor any liability on account of bodily injury to or death of an employee of the insured while engaged in the employment, other than domestic, of the insured, or while engaged in the operation, maintenance or repair of any motor vehicle nor any liability or damage to property owned by, rented to, in charge of or transported by the insured.

Every motor vehicle liability policy is subject to the following provisions which need not be contained therein:

The liability of the insurance carrier with respect to the insurance required by this act shall become absolute whenever injury or damage covered by the motor vehicle liability policy occurs. The policy may not be cancelled or annulled as to the liability by any agreement between the insurance carrier and the insured after the occurrence of the injury or damage. No statement made by the insured or on his behalf and no violation of the policy shall defeat or void the policy;

The satisfaction by the insured of a judgment for injury or damage shall not be a condition precedent to the right or duty of the insurance carrier to make payment on account of the injury or damage;

The insurance carrier may settle any claim covered by the policy, and if settlement is made in good faith, the amount thereof shall be deductible from the limits of liability specified in paragraph (b)(ii) of this section;

The policy, the written application therefor, if any, and any rider or endorsement which does not conflict with this act shall constitute the entire contract between the parties.

Any policy which grants the coverage required for a motor vehicle liability policy may also grant any lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage specified for a motor vehicle liability policy and the excess or additional coverage is not subject to this act. With respect to a policy which grants excess or additional coverage the “liability policy” shall apply only to that part of the coverage which is required by this section.

Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide that the insured shall reimburse the insurance carrier for any payment the insurance carrier would not have been obligated to make under the terms of the policy except for the provisions of this act.

Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide for the prorating of the insurance thereunder with other valid and collectible insurance.

The requirements for a motor vehicle liability policy may be fulfilled by the policies of one (1) or more insurance carriers which policies together meet the requirements.

Any binder issued pending the issuance of a motor vehicle liability policy shall be deemed to fulfill the requirements for the policy.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 21; C.S. 1945, § 60-1521; W.S. 1957, § 31-306; Laws 1961, ch. 165, § 3; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1993, ch. 106, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

Household immunity clauses rendered void to extent of minimumliability coverage. —

Automobile public liability and property damage insurance policies issued in purported compliance with §

31-4-103

, the compulsory insurance statute, must, to the extent of the minimum liability security identified in subsection (b)(ii) of this section and § 31-9-102(a)(xi), cover all owners of motor vehicles who operate or permit the operation of their motor vehicles in Wyoming; consequently, household immunity clauses of such policies, to the extent of the aforesaid minimum requirements, are rendered void and of no force and effect. Allstate Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Ins. Dep't, 672 P.2d 810,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1983).

Liability under policy is not limited by amounts set out underthis section. —

See Sandahl v. Iowa Home Mut. Casualty Co., 229 F.2d 662, 1956 U.S. App. LEXIS 3610 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1956).

Reports made after injury or damage cannot vary or enlargecoverage. —

Under subsection (f)(i), it would be anomalous to hold that statements, i.e., reports, made after injury or damage could vary or enlarge the coverage provided by the insurance contract. Wyoming Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. May, 434 P.2d 507,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1967).

Policy's exclusions valid. —

“Fellow-employee” and “insured's employee” exclusions in insurance policy contract properly denied coverage under subsection (e) to employee for liability arising out of co-employee's death resulting from employee's use of insured's motor vehicle during the course of their employment. State Farm Mut. Auto Ins. Co. v. Dyer, 19 F.3d 514, 1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 4890 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Boode v. Allied Mut. Ins. Co., 458 P.2d 653,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1969); Martin v. Farmers Ins. Exch., 894 P.2d 618,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Automobile and the Omnibus Clause,” see 18 Wyo. L.J. 241 (1964).

For article, “Understanding the Tort of Third-Party Bad Faith in Wyoming: Western Casualty & Surety Company v. Fowler Revisited,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 635 (1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When is automobile “used under contract in behalf of, or loaned to,” insured, within meaning of “hired automobile” provision of automobile insurance policy, 5 ALR4th 636.

Construction and effect of provision excluding liability for automobile-related injuries or damage from coverage of homeowner's or personal liability policy, 6 ALR4th 555.

Risks within “loading and unloading” clause of motor vehicle liability insurance policy, 6 ALR4th 686.

When is automobile furnished or available for regular use within “drive other car” coverage of automobile liability policy, 8 ALR4th 387.

What constitutes “private passenger automobile” in insurance policy provisions defining risks covered or excepted, 11 ALR4th 475.

Liability insurance: misstatement by insured, later withdrawn or corrected, as breach of cooperation clause, 13 ALR4th 837.

Right of “named insured” in automobile insurance policy to delete coverage on nonowned automobile or other vehicle without notice to owner or operator thereof, 13 ALR4th 905.

Validity, construction and effect of “no-consent-to-settlement” exclusion clauses in automobile insurance policy, 18 ALR4th 249.

Validity of exclusion in automobile insurance policy precluding recovery of no-fault benefits for injuries arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of an uninsured vehicle owned by an insured, 18 ALR4th 632.

Conflict of laws in determination of coverage under automobile liability insurance policy, 20 ALR4th 738.

Fact that passenger in vehicle is owner as affecting right to recover from driver for injuries to, or death of, passenger incurred in consequence of driver's negligence, 21 ALR4th 459.

Unlicensed automobile owned by insured as “owned automobile” within language of automobile liability insurance, 21 ALR4th 918.

Omnibus clause as extending automobile liability coverage to third person using car with consent of permittee of named insured, 21 ALR4th 1146.

Combining or “stacking” uninsured motorist coverages provided in single policy applicable to different vehicles of individual insured, 23 ALR4th 12.

Combining or “stacking” uninsured motorist coverages provided in separate policies issued by same insurer to different insureds, 23 ALR4th 108.

Recoverability, under uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage, of deficiencies in compensation afforded injured party by tortfeasor's liability coverage, 24 ALR4th 13.

Right to recover under uninsured or underinsured motorist insurance for injuries attributable to joint tortfeasors, one of whom is insured, 24 ALR4th 63.

Combining or “stacking” uninsured motorist coverages provided in separate policies issued by same insurer to same insured, 25 ALR4th 6.

Combining or “stacking” medical payment provisions of automobile liability policy or policies issued by one or more insurers to different insureds, 25 ALR4th 66.

Combining or “stacking” uninsured motorist coverages provided in fleet policy, 25 ALR4th 896.

Compensability, under automobile no-fault or personal protection insurance, of physical care services afforded injured insured by spouse or other person in close relationship, 28 ALR4th 700.

Combining or “stacking” of “no fault” or personal injury protection (PIP) coverages in automobile liability policy or policies, 29 ALR4th 12.

Combining or “stacking” medical payment provisions of automobile liability policy or policies issued by one or more insurers to one insured, 29 ALR4th 49.

Propriety of automobile insurer's policy of refusing insurance, or requiring advanced rates, because of age, sex, residence or handicap, 33 ALR4th 523.

What constitutes sufficiently serious personal injury, disability, impairment or the like to justify recovery of damages outside of no-fault automobile insurance coverage, 33 ALR4th 767.

Apportionment of payments of no-fault (personal injury protection) benefits between insurers providing coverage to same insured under policies covering different vehicles, 34 ALR4th 374.

What constitutes occupancy of motor vehicle for purposes of nonfault automobile insurance coverage, 35 ALR4th 364.

What constitutes ownership of automobile within meaning of automobile insurance owner's policy, 36 ALR4th 7.

Who is a “spouse” within clause of automobile liability, uninsured motorist or no-fault insurance policy defining additional insured, 36 ALR4th 588.

Right of liability insurer or uninsured motorist insurer to invoke defense based on insured's tort immunity arising out of marital or other close family relationship to injured party, 36 ALR4th 747.

Fact that passenger in negligently operated motor vehicle is owner as affecting passenger's liability to or rights against third person — modern cases, 37 ALR4th 565.

Right of insurer under automobile insurance policy to restitution of payments made under mistake, 37 ALR4th 1048.

Automobile fire, theft and collision insurance: insurable interest in stolen motor vehicle, 38 ALR4th 538.

Construction and application of “automatic insurance” or “newly-acquired vehicle” clause (“replacement,” and “blanket,” or “fleet” provisions) contained in automobile liability policy, 39 ALR4th 229.

No-fault insurance: general release of tortfeasor by accident victim as affecting automobile insurer's obligation for personal injury protection (PIP) benefits, 39 ALR4th 378.

Statutory or policy exclusion, from automobile no-fault coverage, of property damage covered by homeowner's policy of household member who is owner, registrant or operator of vehicle involved, 41 ALR4th 973.

Construction and application of statute imposing liability expressly upon motor vehicle lessor for damage caused by operation of vehicle, 41 ALR4th 993.

Construction and application of substitution provision of automobile liability policy, 42 ALR4th 1145.

Injury or death caused by assault as within coverage of no-fault motor vehicle insurance, 44 ALR4th 1010.

Self-insurance against liability as “other insurance” within meaning of liability insurance policy, 46 ALR4th 707.

Consortium claim of spouse, parent or child of accident victim as within extended “per accident” coverage rather than “per person” coverage of automobile liability policy, 46 ALR4th 735.

Automobile liability insurance policy flight from police exclusion: validity and effect, 49 ALR4th 325.

Validity, under insurance statutes, of coverage exclusion for injury to or death of insured's family or household member, 52 ALR4th 18.

Who is “employed or engaged in the automobile business” within exclusionary clause of liability policy, 55 ALR4th 261.

What constitutes use of vehicle “in the automobile business” within exclusionary clause of liability policy, 56 ALR4th 300.

What constitutes “entering” or “alighting from” vehicle within meaning of insurance policy, or statute mandating insurance coverage, 59 ALR4th 149.

What constitutes single accident or occurrence within liability policy limiting insurer's liability to a specified amount per accident or occurrence, 64 ALR4th 668.

Automobile insurance: umbrella or catastrophe policy automobile liability coverage as affected by primary policy “other insurance” clause, 67 ALR4th 14.

Liability of insurer for prejudgment interest in excess of policy limits for covered loss, 23 ALR5th 75.

Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage: validity, construction and effect of policy provision purporting to reduce coverage by amount paid or payable under workers' compensation law, 31 ALR5th 116.

Automobile insurance coverage for drive-by shootings and other incidents involving the intentional discharge of firearms from moving motor vehicles, 41 ALR5th 91.

No-fault insurance coverage for injury or death of insured occurring during carjacking or attempted carjacking, 42 ALR5th 727.

Validity, construction, and application of provision in automobile liability policy excluding from coverage injury to, or death of, employee of insured, 43 ALR5th 149.

Duty of liability insurer to initiate settlement negotiations, 51 ALR5th 701.

§ 31-9-406.
Cancellation or termination of insurance; exclusion of named driver.

When an insurance carrier has certified a motor vehicle liability policy under W.S.

31-9-403

or a policy under W.S.

31-9-404

, the insurance certified shall not be cancelled, renewed with exclusions pursuant to W.S.

26-35-105

or terminated until at least ten (10) days after a notice of cancellation, renewal with exclusions or termination of the insurance certified is filed with the division, except that a policy subsequently procured and certified shall, on the effective date of its certification, terminate the insurance previously certified with respect to any motor vehicle designated in both certificates.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 22; C.S. 1945, § 60-1522; W.S. 1957, § 31-307; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1993, ch. 106, § 2.

Cited

in

Michelsen v. Gilbert, 449 P.2d 795,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1969).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State regulation or insurer's nonacceptance, cancellation or nonrenewal of, or increase in rate on, automobile insurance policy, based on driving record, 36 ALR4th 1205.

Cancellation of compulsory or “financial responsibility” automobile insurance, 44 ALR4th 13.

Validity and construction of automobile insurance provision or statute automatically terminating coverage when insured obtains another policy providing similar coverage, 61 ALR4th 1130.

Validity, construction and application of “named driver exclusion” in automobile insurance policy, 33 ALR5th 121.

§ 31-9-407.
Excepted insurance policies.

This act does not apply to or affect policies of automobile insurance against liability which may now or hereafter be required by any other law of this state, and the policies, if they contain an agreement or are endorsed to conform to the requirements of this act, may be certified as proof of financial responsibility under this act.

This act does not apply to or affect policies insuring solely the insured named in the policy against liability resulting from the maintenance or use by persons in the insured’s employ or on his behalf of motor vehicles not owned by the insured.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 23; C.S. 1945, § 60-1523; W.S. 1957, § 31-308; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

§ 31-9-408.
Surety bonds.

Proof of financial responsibility may be evidenced by the bond of a surety company duly authorized to transact business within this state, or a bond with at least two (2) individual sureties each owning real estate within this state, which real estate shall be scheduled in the bond approved by a judge of a court of record. The bond shall be conditioned for payment of the amounts specified in W.S. 31-9-102(a)(xi). Except as provided in W.S. 31-9-202(d), the bond shall be filed with the division and is not cancelable except after ten (10) days written notice to the division. The bond constitutes a lien in favor of the state upon the real estate scheduled of any surety and the lien shall exist in favor of any holder of a final judgment against the person who has filed the bond, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof, resulting from the ownership, maintenance, use or operation of a motor vehicle after the bond was filed, upon the filing of notice to that effect by the division in the office of the proper clerk or court of the county or city where the real estate is located. The notice shall be recorded and indexed in the same manner as now provided by law for real estate mortgages.

If a judgment, rendered against the principal on the bond is not satisfied within thirty (30) days after it becomes final, the judgment creditor may, for his own use and benefit and at his sole expense, bring an action in the name of the state against the company or persons executing the bond, including an action or proceeding to foreclose any lien that may exist upon the real estate of a person who has executed the bond. The foreclosure shall be by proceeding in the district court of the county where the real estate is located unless it is in more than one (1) county in which case the action shall be brought in any county in which any of the property is situated.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 24; C.S. 1945, § 60-1524; W.S. 1957, § 31-309; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

§ 31-9-409.
Cash and securities deposited with the director.

Proof of financial responsibility may be evidenced by the certificate of the director of the department of transportation that the person named therein has deposited twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) in cash, or securities as provided by W.S.

9-4-821

or as may legally be purchased for trust funds of a market value of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00). The director shall not accept any deposit and issue a certificate therefor and the division shall not accept the certificates unless accompanied by evidence that there are no unsatisfied judgments of any character against the depositor in the county where the depositor resides. The director shall submit receipt and acknowledgement of all deposits and payments under this section to the state treasurer.

The deposit shall be held by the director to satisfy, in accordance with this act, any execution on a judgment issued against the person making the deposit, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property including the loss of use thereof, resulting from the ownership, maintenance, use or operation of a motor vehicle after the deposit was made. Money or securities so deposited is not subject to attachment or execution unless the attachment or execution arises out of a suit for damages as provided by this subsection.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 25; C.S. 1945, § 60-1525; W.S. 1957, § 31-310; Laws 1961, ch. 165, § 4; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a) and (b), substituted “director” for “state treasurer” in the second sentence; in (a), substituted “director of the department of transportation” for “state treasurer” and deleted “with him” following deposited in the first sentence, and added the present last sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

§ 31-9-410.
Proof by owner in lieu of driver.

Whenever any person required to give proof of financial responsibility is or later becomes a driver in the employ of any owner, or is or later becomes a member of the immediate family or household of the owner, the division shall accept proof given by the owner in lieu of proof by the other person to permit the other person to drive a motor vehicle for which the owner has given proof as herein provided.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 26; C.S. 1945, § 60-1526; W.S. 1957, § 31-311; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

§ 31-9-411.
Substitution of proof.

The division shall consent to the cancellation of any bond or certificate of insurance or the division shall direct and the state treasurer shall return any money or securities to the person entitled thereto upon the substitution and acceptance of other adequate proof of financial responsibility pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 27; C.S. 1945, § 60-1527; W.S. 1957, § 31-312; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

§ 31-9-412.
When further proof required.

Whenever any proof of financial responsibility filed under this act no longer fulfills the purposes for which required, the division shall require other proof as required by this act and shall suspend the license and registration of the nonresident’s operating privilege pending the filing of other proof.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 28; C.S. 1945, § 60-1528; W.S. 1957, § 31-313; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

Cited

in

Michelsen v. Gilbert, 449 P.2d 795,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1969).

§ 31-9-413.
Cancellation or return; reestablishment.

Proof of financial responsibility is not required to be maintained if:

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 173, §§ 1, 2.

The person on whose behalf proof was filed dies or is unable to drive a motor vehicle due to permanent incapacity; or

The person who has given proof surrenders his license and registration to the division.

The division shall not consent to the cancellation of any bond or the return of any money or securities if any action for damages upon a liability covered by the proof is then pending or any judgment upon any liability is then unsatisfied, or if the person who has filed bond or deposited money or securities has, within one (1) year immediately preceding the request, been involved as an operator or owner in any motor vehicle accident resulting in injury or damage to the person or property of others. An affidavit of the applicant as to the nonexistence of such facts, or that he has been released from all of his liability, or has been finally adjudicated not to be liable, for the injury or damage, is sufficient evidence thereof in the absence of evidence to the contrary in the records of the division.

Whenever any person whose proof has been cancelled or returned under paragraph (a)(iii) of this section applies for a license or registration within a period of three (3) years from the date proof was originally required, the application shall be refused unless the applicant shall reestablish proof for the remainder of the three (3) year period.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 29; C.S. 1945, § 60-1529; W.S. 1957, § 31-314; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 173, §§ 1, 2.

§ 31-9-414.
Self-insurer.

Any person in whose name more than twenty-five (25) motor vehicles are registered may qualify as a self-insurer by filing cash, securities or a surety bond in the amount of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) plus one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each vehicle in excess of twenty-five (25) to be covered, which cash, securities or surety bond shall otherwise meet the requirements of W.S.

31-9-408

and

31-9-409

.

The division may upon application issue a certificate of self-insurance to a person who has satisfied the requirements under subsection (a) of this section. The certificate of self-insurance shall apply to the owner and all operators and shall expire three (3) years from the date of issue.

Upon not less than ten (10) days notice and a hearing pursuant to notice, the division may upon reasonable grounds cancel a certificate of self-insurance. Reasonable grounds for cancellation shall be:

Failure to pay any judgment within thirty (30) days after judgment is final;

Failure within thirty (30) days to requalify under subsection (a) of this section when any portion of the bond on file has been used to satisfy a judgment; or

A showing the person no longer has twenty-five (25) motor vehicles registered in his name.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 34; C.S. 1945, § 60-1534; W.S. 1957, § 31-315; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 173, § 1.

Appropriate for state to allow licensee to be own insurer.—

It is appropriate and reasonable for a state to require insurance or its equivalent as a condition for the issuance of a license, and it follows that it is all the more appropriate and reasonable for a state to allow a licensee to be his own insurer, upon the condition that he is prepared to show financial responsibility or the equivalent of insurance when the need therefor arises by reason of an accident in connection with which a judgment might be obtained against the licensee. And, of course, it is appropriate and reasonable for a license and registration to be suspended if the licensee fails to show such financial responsibility after an accident in connection with which a judgment might be obtained against him. Thornley v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, Motor Vehicle Div., 478 P.2d 600,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

Michelsen v. Gilbert, 449 P.2d 795,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1969).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability of uninsured motorist statutes to self-insurers, 27 ALR4th 1266.

§ 31-9-415.
Proof of group financial responsibility.

Any religious or charitable tax exempt group pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is able to demonstrate to the state auditor that the group has met financial commitments and obligations of this nature of the individuals who comprise the group for the five (5) previous years and whose members combined own more than five (5) registered motor vehicles may qualify as a self-insurer by filing cash, securities or a surety bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), which cash, securities or surety bond shall otherwise meet the requirements of W.S.

31-9-408

and

31-9-409

.

The department may upon application issue a certificate of self-insurance to each group who has satisfied the requirements under subsection (a) of this section. The certificate of self-insurance shall apply to the owners and all operators who are members of the group and shall expire three (3) years from the date of issue.

Upon not less than ten (10) days notice and a hearing pursuant to notice, the department may upon reasonable grounds cancel a certificate of self-insurance. Reasonable grounds for cancellation shall include:

Failure to pay, or enter into an agreement to pay, any judgment within sixty (60) days after judgment is final;

Failure within thirty (30) days to requalify under subsection (a) of this section when any portion of the bond on file has been used to satisfy a judgment;

A showing that the tax exempt group no longer has five (5) motor vehicles registered to the members of the group; or

A failure to report that a member of the group no longer qualifies.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 154, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

Internal Revenue Code. —

The Internal Revenue Code is codified at 26 U.S. Code.